Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 176 Department of Highways

176.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Biennial highway construction plan” means the specifically identified individual transportation projects or portions thereof identified for funding during the upcoming biennium, which correspond to the first two (2) years of the six (6) year road plan;

“Department” means Department of Highways;

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet;

“Lowest and best bidder” includes the reciprocal resident bidder preference described in KRS

176.082

;

“Project” means the design, right-of-way, utility, or construction phase of a highway construction project;

“Roads” includes highways, bridges, and bridge approaches; and

“Six (6) year road plan” means the plan developed under KRS

176.430

.

History.

Created by the Legislative Research Commission, Acts 1942, ch. 408, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; amend. Acts 2009, ch. 78, §. 19, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 162, § 23, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 190, § 13, effective June 29, 2021.

176.020.
Appointment of state highway engineer — Divisions within the department.

With prior approval of the Governor and the secretary in writing, the commissioner of highways shall appoint as state highway engineer, a civil engineer who has had at least six (6) years executive engineering experience in the design, supervision, and construction of highways. He shall be the technical advisor to the commissioner of highways, and under the direction of the commissioner, he shall supervise all construction and maintenance work of the department and perform such other duties as are assigned to him by the commissioner.

With prior approval of the secretary and pursuant to KRS Chapter 12, the department shall be divided into such divisions as the commissioner of highways may deem necessary to perform the duties and functions of the department. Each division shall perform the duties assigned to it by the commissioner of highways and shall be headed by a director who shall act under the direction and supervision of the commissioner of highways.

History.

4356t-2, 4618-99: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 18; 1948, ch. 80, § 19; 1954, ch. 242; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 17.

176.030.
State Highway Commission. [Repealed.]

176.040.
Employees of department; salaries. [Repealed.]

176.050.
Duties of department.

The department shall:

Investigate all problems relating to the construction and maintenance of roads in the state;

Examine all projects and ascertain the feasibility of all routes;

Obtain information as to the proper type of road for any project;

Examine all types of road materials which may be used in the construction or maintenance of any road to be constructed by the department or under its direction or supervision;

Require the design plans for all road projects constructing a new route to identify, if at all feasible, one (1) or more publicly owned sites at least four (4) acres in size, along the proposed new route that will be used as waste sites during the construction phase of the project but that have the potential for a city, county, or other governmental entity to turn the site into an industrial park upon completion of the road project, regardless of whether the site currently has the infrastructure necessary to support an industrial park;

Consult with all legislative bodies affected by a new road construction project during the design phase for the purpose of soliciting local government officials’ preferences for the location of waste sites that could be turned into an industrial park;

From time to time, examine and have examined and audited all of its books, papers and records;

Cause to be made all necessary surveys in the establishment and construction of the system of public highways; all necessary maps, prints, plans and specifications of all work to be done on the roads; estimates of costs; advertisement for bids; contracts for construction or maintenance; and all necessary forms in connection therewith; and

Promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A for the care and maintenance of roads after they have been constructed.

The department may publish bulletins containing useful information concerning the construction and maintenance of roads.

An invoice or bill to be paid out of the road or bridge funds shall not be approved by the department for payment until it has been carefully examined by the department to ascertain if the bill or invoice is in every respect a proper and legitimate charge against the road or bridge funds. The commissioner may call before him any person who may have information respecting any bill or invoice.

History.

4356t-3e, 4356t-3f; 1998, ch. 181, § 1, effective March 27, 1998.

176.051.
Department to eradicate noxious weeds and invasive plants on rights-of-way — Advertisement of program — Administrative regulations.

The Department of Highways shall keep all state rights-of-way free of all of the following, which are noxious weeds and invasive plants:

The species of grass, Sorghum halepense, commonly known as Johnson grass;

The species of weed commonly known as giant foxtail;

The thistles Cirsium arvense and Carduus nutans, commonly known as Canada thistles and nodding thistles, respectively;

Multiflora rose;

Kudzu;

Poison hemlock;

Marestail;

Amur honeysuckle;

Japanese knotweed; and

Common teasel.

Upon written request, the department shall give priority to and shall cooperate with any abutting property owner engaged in a program of eradication by eradicating the noxious weeds and invasive plants identified in subsection (1) of this section, or in administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, from abutting state rights-of-way. The department shall take steps to eradicate this grass and these weeds or thistles by the use of chemicals or any other means found to be effective by the department.

The Department of Highways shall inform property owners of the availability of the eradication program. In carrying out this responsibility the department shall, no later than the first week in March of every year, advertise in each county, pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 424 that the program is available. The department shall stipulate in the advertisement the place and manner in which an interested property owner may make a written request for inclusion in the program. The department shall also promote awareness of the availability of the eradication program through the use of electronic media and the Cooperative Extension Service.

The Department of Highways may by administrative regulation add noxious weeds and invasive plants to or delete them from the list of noxious weeds and invasive plants enumerated in subsection (1) of this section. In making a determination regarding a noxious weed or invasive plant, the department may consider the following:

The plant’s ability to directly or indirectly injure or cause damage to crops, livestock, poultry, or other interests of agriculture;

The plant’s impact on the public health;

The plant’s impact on the environment; and

The level of difficulty associated with controlling or eradicating the plant.

The department shall review this administrative regulation at least once every four (4) years.

For purposes of this subsection, “livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2; 1960, ch. 149; 1968, ch. 65; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 80, § 1, effective March 29, 1976; 1980, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 29, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 433, § 3, effective April 10, 1990; 2014, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 129, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

176.052.
State Highway Commission; appointment; term; duties. [Repealed.]

176.053.
Trees along rights-of-way — Proceeds from sale of products.

The Department of Highways is authorized to plant or set trees on and along any and all rights-of-way of highways or state property adjacent thereto, and to cut and sell wood, lumber, or forest products therefrom.

All proceeds from the sale of such wood, lumber, or forest products shall be held in a separate fund for the maintenance, construction, or improvement of highways, or the acquiring of rights-of-way, and the improvement or development thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 132, §§ 1, 2.

176.054.
Obtaining trees to carry out KRS 176.053.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall furnish to the Department of Highways such seedlings or young trees as the department may require, or as may be available. The Department of Highways shall pay to the Energy and Environment Cabinet the reasonable value thereof as may be agreed upon between such departments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 132, § 3; 2010, ch. 24, § 230, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Natural resources and environmental protection cabinet, KRS Ch. 149.

176.055.
Dissemination of information concerning roads and highways.

The Department of Highways may purchase space in magazines, newspapers, and other publications and may cause to be made and circulated all maps, prints, plans, lithographs, engravings, photographs, drawings, art work, and other specialized work deemed necessary in the dissemination of information concerning its roads and highways.

The Department of Highways, with the approval of the Governor, may expend an amount not in excess of two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) a year for the purposes set out in subsection (1) hereof.

The provisions of KRS Chapter 57 shall not be applicable or controlling in the expenditure of this fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 47, §§ 1 to 3.

176.057.
Certain railroad property to be considered roads — Use of funds for maintenance and repair.

For the purposes of this chapter and KRS Chapter 178 on and after July 1, 2010, railroad crossings, railroad spurs that access industrial parks, and shortline railroads at or near intersections with roadways shall be considered roads. The industrial access road fund within the Transportation Cabinet and other funds specified by the secretary or requested by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development may be used for their maintenance and repair.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 54, effective June 26, 2009.

176.060.
Roads under construction — Regulation of traffic — Temporary roads.

The department may stop or regulate all traffic over any road being constructed or improved until it is ready to be opened to the public, and may designate other roads for the accommodation of traffic until the construction is completed. The department may establish temporary roads while such construction is going on, and may make arrangements with landowners for necessary temporary rights-of-way, and may contract and pay for such rights-of-way out of appropriations from the state road fund by certifying the costs to the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The temporary road shall be opened for travel at least two (2) weeks before work is begun on the road proposed to be constructed or improved.

History.

4356t-3f.

176.070.
Advertisement for bids.

After surveys, plans, specifications and estimates have been completed for any road or section thereof, and the type and character of the road has been determined, and the right-of-way obtained, the bureau shall advertise by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, for bids on the work, and may contract for the purchase of all materials necessary for the construction and maintenance of roads.

Before advertising for bids for the construction or reconstruction of any highway, the department may determine the type of improvement desired, and may advertise and receive bids for only the types determined. The advertisement shall make it generally known that the work is to be done, and shall state the place where the bidders may examine the plans and specifications.

History.

4356t-3f, 4356t-6, 4356t-17-2b: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 150.

176.080.
Bond or check to accompany bid — Opening of bids — Awarding of contracts — Security — Bids may be rejected — Advertisement for new bids.

Each bidder shall accompany his bid with a bond or certified check payable to the State Treasurer for a reasonable sum, fixed by the department, guaranteeing that he will enter into a contract with the department for doing the work if the work is awarded to him.

Bids shall be opened publicly at the time and place designated in the invitation for bids. At the time the bids are opened, the department shall announce the department’s engineer’s estimate and make it a part of the department’s records pertaining to the letting of any highway construction project contract for which bids were received. Each bid, together with the name of the bidder and the department’s engineer’s estimate, shall be recorded and open to public inspection.

The contract shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder. The department may require bonds from any contractor to secure the performance of any contract or may require security by any other means it deems advisable.

The department may reject any bid when it finds it for the best interest of the state to do so. When all bids are rejected, the department shall advertise for new bids as in the first place.

History.

4356t-3f, 4356t-6: 1994, ch. 278, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

176.082.
Reciprocal preference to be given to resident bidders on construction projects.

Prior to a contract being awarded for the construction phase of a project, a resident bidder of the Commonwealth shall be given a preference against a nonresident bidder registered in any state that gives or requires a preference to bidders from that state. The preference shall be equal to the preference given or required by the state of the nonresident bidder and shall be applied after the opening of the bids.

A resident bidder is an individual, partnership, association, corporation, or other business entity that, on the date the department advertises for bids:

Is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth; and

Has for one (1) year prior to and through the date of advertisement, filed Kentucky corporate or other business income taxes, made payments to the Kentucky unemployment insurance fund established in KRS

341.490

, and maintained a Kentucky workers’ compensation policy in effect.

A nonresident bidder is an individual, partnership, association, corporation, or other business entity that does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

The department shall use the list and administrative regulations described in KRS 45A.494(6) to determine the preferences to be given in awarding a contract.

The preference shall not be given if the preference conflicts with federal law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 162, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

176.085.
Compliance with workers’ compensation insurance and unemployment insurance laws required — Foreign entity to obtain certificate of authority — Penalty.

No contract for building, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, or other type work on any state road, waterway, or aviation-related work, shall be awarded by any agency, department, or office of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to any person until that person assures, by affidavit, that all contractors and subcontractors employed, or that will be employed, under the provisions of the contract shall be in compliance with Kentucky requirements for workers’ compensation insurance according to KRS Chapter 342 and unemployment insurance according to KRS Chapter 341.

An agency, department, office, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall not award a contract to a person that is a foreign entity unless that foreign entity, on the records of the Secretary of State, holds a certificate of authority or a statement of foreign qualification.

Any person who fails to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section during the term of the state contract, upon such finding by a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be fined an amount not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), or an amount equal to the sum of uninsured and unsatisfied claims brought under the provisions of KRS Chapter 342 and unemployment insurance claims for which no wages were reported as required by KRS Chapter 341, whichever is greater.

The penalty imposed in subsection (2) of this section shall be enforced by the county attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 174, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2011, ch. 80, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 87, effective July 12, 2012.

176.090.
Provisions of contract — Partial and complete payment — Bonds, bids, etc., to be filed.

The contract shall state the time when the work shall be begun and completed, and the time and manner of payment. The department may require that a certain percent of the contract price, or a certain fixed sum shall not be paid to the contractor until a fixed time after completion and acceptance of the work.

When the contract provides for partial payment based on the amount of work done, the representative of the department in charge of the work shall present to the department, as each payment becomes due, a certificate signed by him, showing as nearly as possible the amount of work done for which payment is to be made. If the state highway engineer finds that the amount certified is due, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall draw a warrant for the amount certified, on the request of the Department of Highways.

When the work has been fully completed, the representative of the department shall certify to the department a detailed and itemized statement of the cost of the work done, and if it is found to be correct, the department shall certify the amount to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, which shall draw a warrant for the amount due.

All bonds and bids filed and all contracts approved by the department and a copy of all specifications and certifications shall be kept on file in the office of the department.

History.

4356t-6.

176.095.
Contractor’s deposit of securities with department.

Where any percent of a contract price or a certain fixed sum shall have been retained pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS

176.090

, the contractor may from time to time withdraw the whole or any portion of the amount retained for payments to the contractor pursuant to the terms of the contract and substitute therefor securities of the following classes which are upon deposit with a custodian designated by the commissioner of the department and approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet:

United States treasury bonds, United States treasury notes, United States certificates of indebtedness, United States treasury bills,

Bonds of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or

Bonds of any political subdivision, including school districts, of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

No amount shall be withdrawn in excess of the market value of the securities at the time of deposit or the par value of such securities, whichever is lower.

The custodian shall on a regular basis collect all the interest or income on the obligations so deposited and shall pay the same when and as collected to the contractor who deposited the obligations. If the deposit is in the form of coupon bonds, the custodian shall deliver each coupon as it matures to the contractor.

Any amount deducted by the department, pursuant to the terms of the contract, from the retained payments otherwise due the contract, shall be deducted first from that portion of such retained payments for which no security has been substituted, then from the proceeds of any deposited security. In the latter case, the contractor shall be entitled to receive interest, coupons or income only from those securities which remain after such amount has been deducted.

The securities so deposited shall be properly endorsed by the contractor in such manner so as to enable the custodian to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 38; 1972, ch. 203, § 34; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 155, § 41, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A contractor depositing securities with an approved custodian in order to withdraw his retainage has both legal and equitable title to such securities, and he may substitute other qualified securities for those on deposit when approved by the bureau of highways (now Department of Highways) and the custodian.

OAG 73-694

.

176.100.
Deviation from contract.

No contractor shall deviate from the provisions, plans or specifications upon which a contract has been awarded without first having obtained written authority from the department to do so. If the contractor does deviate without such authority, neither the State of Kentucky, the Department of Highways, the Finance and Administration Cabinet nor the State Treasurer shall pay or be liable for any work or material not fully provided for in the original contract.

History.

4356t-3f.

176.110.
Breach of contract — Cancellation to keep expenditures within annual income.

If any person having a contract with the department fails to carry out the contract, the department may cancel the contract and reaward it without advertisement if it can obtain a qualified contractor to perform the work at the original contract price or for less. Otherwise the work shall be advertised as required by law.

When the department ascertains that the cost of any contract or the cost of continued work on any contract will exceed the revenues of the fiscal year, the department may cancel any such contract or any portion thereof necessary in order to keep expenditures within the revenues of the fiscal year, and may contract for the completion of such work when the funds are available without advertising the work if it can obtain a qualified contractor to assume the work at the original contract price. Otherwise the work shall be advertised as required by law.

History.

4356t-3f.

176.120.
Construction work that may be done by department. [Repealed.]

176.121.
Construction work by department employees.

The Department of Highways may cause any road construction or reconstruction to be done by employees of the department instead of through contractors when, in the opinion of the commissioner as expressed in an official order, any of the following conditions is found to exist:

Emergency construction or reconstruction is made necessary by the fact that a road has been rendered unusable or the urgency of need for construction or reconstruction is apparent.

Construction or reconstruction of access roads would serve as an inducement to industrial location or substantial expansion of industry, and the estimated cost of the project is less than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000).

The project involves: an existing road and provides for such work as improvement of sight distance, traffic marking, channelization or the addition or widening of traffic lanes or widening of shoulders; or construction, reconstruction, widening or strengthening of small bridges and projects for which preparation of detailed plans required to secure bids is unnecessary; or an emergency need does not allow for time for preparation of plans and advertisement for bids.

No satisfactory bid is received for the construction or reconstruction of the road after all necessary steps have been taken to obtain bids for such work, and the estimated cost of the projects is less than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000).

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 22, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1974, ch. 92, § 1; 1980, ch. 46, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

176.122.
Definitions for KRS 176.122 to 176.128.

As used in KRS

176.122

to

176.128

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means Department of Highways, Commonwealth of Kentucky.

“Person” means any individual, firm, agency, company, association, partnership or corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 154, § 1.

176.124.
Work of department personnel restricted to rights-of-way.

No officer, agent or employee of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, Department of Highways, shall perform or cause to be performed any work or provide or cause to be provided services of any nature beyond the right-of-way limits of any public road, nor shall any person accept the work or services of any officer, agent or employee of the department on private property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 154, § 2.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The practice of grading and graveling private driveways and private roads by the bureau of highways (now Department of Highways) or the county road department is clearly illegal under this section and KRS

176.126

, subject to the penalties provided in KRS

176.990

, and a citizen who has knowledge of violation of these statutes should report them to the Commonwealth Attorney or the county attorney of the county.

OAG 73-129

.

176.126.
Use of department goods and materials restricted to rights-of-way.

No goods or materials belonging to or under control of the department shall be used in work of any nature beyond the right-of-way limits of any public road, nor shall any person accept or permit the use of such goods or materials on private property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 154, § 3.

176.128.
Effect of KRS 176.122 to 176.128.

Nothing in KRS

176.122

to

176.128

shall be so construed as to prevent the lawful execution of other granted powers necessary to accomplish the purposes of the Department of Highways.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 154, § 6.

176.130.
Certificates of eligibility for contractors — Application — When necessary.

Every person who seeks to procure, bid upon, or offer to bid upon any contract with the department for the construction or maintenance of any public road or any section thereof, before procuring a proposal form or submitting any bid to obtain such contract, shall procure a certificate of eligibility from the department to bid on such work.

All applications for a certificate of eligibility shall be made to the department in writing, and the department shall act upon the application within thirty (30) days after the application is filed.

A certificate of eligibility is not necessary where the department purchases equipment, material and supplies directly, except in the case of the purchase of crushed stone in lots of more than one thousand (1,000) tons, or bituminous materials in tank car lots.

History.

4356t-18, 4356t-25.

176.140.
Determination of eligibility to bid.

The department shall determine who shall be eligible to bid upon any contract with the department for the construction or maintenance of any public road or section thereof. The department may adopt rules and regulations and make investigations and examinations to determine the financial status, experience, responsibility, business ability, previous record, sufficiency of plant and equipment, and any other pertinent facts necessary to determine the eligibility of the proposed bidder.

The department shall establish rules and regulations governing the application for the certificate of eligibility, the means and methods of obtaining information relative to the applicant, and the granting of, or refusal to grant, a certificate of eligibility, and may require a financial statement of the applicant, verified by the applicant or, in the case of a corporation, by an authorized official thereof, as often as the department deems it necessary, and at least once in every twelve (12) months.

History.

4356t-19.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

See note to KRS

176.130

. Corum v. United States, 268 F. Supp. 109, 1967 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11546 (W.D.

Ky. 1967

).

176.150.
Information required with application for certificate of eligibility.

No applicant shall be given a certificate of eligibility unless his financial statement and the investigation made by the department show that he possesses net current assets or working capital sufficient in the judgment of the department to render it probable that he can satisfactorily execute his contracts and meet obligations therein incurred. All applications for certificates shall expressly authorize the department to obtain all information which it deems pertinent with respect to the financial status, assets, and liabilities of the applicant from any persons having business transactions with the applicant, and shall expressly authorize all those persons to furnish any information requested from them by the department.

No applicant shall be given a certificate of eligibility until the applicant provides the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet with his sworn statement made under penalty of perjury that he has not knowingly violated any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth and that the award of a contract to the applicant will not violate any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth. “Knowingly” means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that his conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists.

Certificates of eligibility shall be issued without reference to the residence of applicants and the administrative regulations regarding the issuance of certificates shall apply equally to residents and nonresidents. A certificate of eligibility shall not be denied to any applicant upon the sole issue of nationality or residence.

When the applicant is a foreign corporation, limited liability company, or limited partnership, the application shall be accompanied by a certificate from the Secretary of State of the jurisdiction in which it is organized certifying that it is validly existing and in good standing and a certificate from the Kentucky Secretary of State certifying that it is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

4356t-20, 4356t-22, 4356t-23; 1992, ch. 288, § 22, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 137, § 45, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 45, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, "The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section."

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

See note to KRS

176.130

. Corum v. United States, 268 F. Supp. 109, 1967 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11546 (W.D.

Ky. 1967

).

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

176.160.
Issuance or denial of certificate — Effect.

After obtaining such information as it deems necessary relative to the qualification of the applicant, the department shall determine whether or not the applicant is eligible to bid upon road contracts. The department shall promptly notify all applicants of its final action on their applications.

If the department determines that the applicant is eligible, it shall issue to him a certificate of eligibility which shall entitle the applicant to bid upon any contract with the department for the construction or maintenance of any public road or section thereof upon which bids are being asked.

If the department determines that the applicant is ineligible to bid, it shall reject the application and refuse to issue the certificate of eligibility, and the applicant shall not thereafter make application for a certificate of eligibility until he is qualified, both financially and in all other ways.

History.

4356t-20.

176.170.
Administrative hearing — Appeal.

Any applicant aggrieved by the decision of the department made pursuant to KRS

176.160

may, within ten (10) days after receiving notification of the decision, request in writing an administrative hearing which shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Any applicant who is aggrieved by the final order of the department may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

4356t-20: 1996, ch. 318, § 59, effective July 15, 1996.

176.180.
Limitation on certificate — Rehearing.

In issuing a certificate of eligibility to any applicant, the department may limit the scope of the certificate as to the number or type of projects, or the amount of work that the contractor may bid upon.

Any applicant who is dissatisfied with the department’s ruling as to the aggregate amount of work which he will be permitted to have under contract at any one (1) time, may at any time file a new application for qualification. Such new application shall be promptly considered and acted upon by the department.

History.

4356t-20.

176.190.
Revocation of certificate — Notice — Hearing.

A certificate of eligibility may be revoked by the department only after a written notice is given to the qualified bidder and an opportunity given to him for an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

4356t-21; 1996, ch. 318, § 60, effective July 15, 1996.

176.200.
Subcontractor to be named.

Before making an award the department may require the bidder to name the subcontractor whom he intends to employ for the various divisions of the work bid upon.

History.

4356t-24.

176.210.
Lists of qualified bidders may be made public.

The department may make public from time to time lists of qualified bidders. Such lists shall be general in character and shall not indicate the size of the contracts with respect to which the bidders have qualified.

History.

4356t-22.

176.220.
Bids from unqualified bidders.

The department shall not consider any bid filed with it by any person not holding a certificate of eligibility. Bids from unqualified bidders which are discovered by the department before they are read, shall be returned to the bidders without being read. If the department finds subsequent to the opening of bids that facts exist which would disqualify the lowest bidder, or that such bidder is not responsible and competent, the department shall reject such bid, despite the previous qualification of the bidder. The department shall not award any contract to any bidder not qualified to bid thereon at the time the bids are opened.

History.

4356t-25.

176.230.
License fee. [Repealed.]

176.240.
Federal aid for road building — Cooperation by department — Allocation of funds.

The department may contract with the federal government in regard to the survey, construction and maintenance of roads under any Act of Congress providing federal aid to the states in road construction, and may, subject to the rules of the United States Secretary of Agriculture, make plans for and supervise the construction of federal aid roads, and may do all things necessary to fully carry out the cooperation contemplated.

The department may set apart out of moneys appropriated out of the state road fund an amount equal to any sum allotted to the state by the federal government, or any sum necessary to carry on cooperative work with the federal government.

The State Treasurer may receive money due under the provisions of any federal aid act, and he shall pay out such money upon warrants of the Finance and Administration Cabinet issued in payment of claims certified by the Department of Highways.

History.

4356t-3f.

176.250.
Duties of department in regard to county roads.

The department shall:

Recommend rules and regulations determining the method of constructing roads and fixing the duties of county road engineers and their employees in respect to all public roads;

Instruct and advise with the county road engineers and their employees as to the establishment of grades and suitable systems of drainage and as to the construction, improvement and maintenance of public roads;

Cause plans, specifications and estimates to be prepared for the repair and improvement of public roads and the construction and repair of bridges, and, when requested, advise upon the various methods of road construction adapted to different sections of the state, and as to the best methods of construction and maintenance of public roads throughout the state, and collect such information relating thereto as it deems expedient; and

Cause meetings to be held in each county for the purpose of furnishing general information and instruction upon the maintenance and improvement of public roads and the application of the road laws and the rules of the department. The department shall notify the county engineer of any county of such meetings and specify the date and place thereof.

History.

4356t-13.

176.255.
Administrative control of covered wooden bridges — Title — Maintenance. [Repealed.]

176.260.
Fiscal year of department.

The fiscal year for the Department of Highways which commences on April 1, 1950, shall be extended up to and including June 30, 1951, and thereafter the fiscal year for the department shall begin July 1, and end June 30.

History.

4356t-17-1; amend. Acts 1950, ch. 32, § 1.

176.270.
Finance and Administration Cabinet to furnish income estimates.

On or before June 1 of each year, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall furnish to the Department of Highways estimates of income for the ensuing fiscal year. Upon the request of the Department of Highways the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, from time to time, furnish revised estimates of income.

History.

4356t-17-2; amend. Acts 1950, ch. 32, § 2; 1988, ch. 273, § 9, effective July 15, 1988.

176.280.
Legal service — Duty of county attorneys.

The county attorneys shall each render legal service to the department in carrying out its duties. The services so rendered shall be without additional compensation, and no county attorney shall be required to render service outside his county.

History.

4356t-3f.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Assistant attorneys general for Department of Highways, duties, term, salaries, KRS

15.105

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Underwood, Part-Time Prosecutors and Conflicts
of Interest: A Survey and Some Proposals, 81 Ky. L.J. 1 (1993).

Richardson, Acquisition of Right of Way for Highway Purposes in Kentucky — Right of Eminent Domain and Just Compensation, 36 Ky. L.J. 159 (1948).

176.290.
Renumbered as KRS 44.070.

176.300.
Renumbered as KRS 44.080.

176.310.
Renumbered as KRS 44.090.

176.320.
Renumbered as KRS 44.100.

176.330.
Renumbered as KRS 44.110.

176.340.
Renumbered as KRS 44.120.

176.350.
Renumbered as KRS 44.130.

176.360.
Renumbered as KRS 44.140.

176.370.
Renumbered as KRS 44.150.

176.380.
Renumbered as KRS 44.160.